Mississippi, session 2026, SB2690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Any property and casualty insurer providing coverage for blighted real property in this state shall require that the insured clean up the blighted real property before reimbursing the insured for more than one-fourth (1/4) of the amount of any damages owed to the insured by the insurer.  The Commissioner of Insurance shall enforce the provisions of this section and shall adopt any rules or regulations necessary. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.